Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.080

Detention order—Requirements—Temporary release.

(1) In a detention order issued under RCW 10.21.040, the judicial officer must:

(a) Include written findings of fact and a written statement of the reasons for the detention;

(b) Direct that the person be committed to the custody of the appropriate correctional authorities for confinement separate, to the extent practicable, from persons awaiting or serving sentences or being held in custody pending appeal; and

(c) Direct that the person be afforded reasonable opportunity for private consultation with counsel.

(2) The judicial officer may, by subsequent order, permit the temporary release of the person, in the custody of an appropriate law enforcement officer or other appropriate person, to the extent that the judicial officer determines such release to be necessary for preparation of the person's defense or for another compelling reason.

[ 2010 c 254 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Contingent effective date—2010 c 254: See notes following RCW 10.21.010.